Illinois, session 104th, HB2315.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Support Payment Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 27/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Child 8Support Payment Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-87, eff. 6-30-05.)